Rhode Island, session 2025, SB417.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 44-20-12 of the General Laws in Chapter 44-20 entitled "Cigarette,
Other Tobacco Products, and Electronic Nicotine-Delivery System Products" is hereby amended
to read as follows:
44-20-12. Tax imposed on cigarettes sold.
(a) A tax is imposed on all cigarettes sold or held for sale in the state. The payment of the
tax to be evidenced by stamps, which may be affixed only by licensed distributors to the packages
containing such cigarettes. Any cigarettes on which the proper amount of tax provided for in this
chapter has been paid, payment being evidenced by the stamp, is not subject to a further tax under
this chapter. The tax is at the rate of two hundred twenty-five (225) mills for each cigarette.
(b) Any tax imposed under this chapter shall be reduced by fifty percent (50%) for any
product the Secretary of the United States Department of Health and Human Services determines
to be a modified risk tobacco product pursuant to § 21 U.S.C. 387K. For the purpose of this section,
"modified risk tobacco product" means any tobacco product that is sold or distributed for use to
reduce the harm or the risk of tobacco-related disease associated with commercially marketed
tobacco products.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001406/SUB A
========